Utah statutes.
9-4-1404.   Duties of office.
The office shall:
(1)  coordinate state activities designed to reduce poverty;
(2)  encourage entities in the private sector to participate in efforts to
ameliorate poverty in the community;
(3)  cooperate with agencies of local, state, and federal government in
reducing poverty and implementing community, social, and economic programs;
(4)  receive and expend funds for the purposes outlined in this part;
(5)  enter into contracts with and award grants to public and private
nonprofit agencies and organizations;
(6)  develop a state plan based on needs identified by community action
agencies and community action statewide organizations;
(7)  designate community action agencies to receive funds through the
Community Services Block Grant program;
(8)  fund community action agencies and community action statewide
organizations;
(9)  make rules in conjunction with the division pursuant to Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to carry out the purposes of
this part;
(10)  provide assistance to local governments or private organizations for the
purpose of establishing and operating a community action agency;
(11)  provide technical assistance to community action agencies to improve
program planning, program development, administration, and the mobilization of
public and private resources;
(12)  convene public meetings which provide citizens the opportunity to
comment on public policies and programs to reduce poverty;
(13)  advise the governor and Legislature of the nature and extent of poverty
in the state and make recommendations concerning changes in state and federal
policies and programs;
(14)  encourage Utah's nonprofit humanitarian assistance agencies serving low-
income persons by facilitating, coordinating, training, partnerships, and
providing technical assistance in addressing Utah's low-income persons by
enhancing management, improving service and program delivery, and preserving
flexibility and local initiative;
(15)  develop and implement management goals which fulfill the Community
Services Block Grant mission, state requirements, and the mandates of federal
legislation;
(16)  prepare a Community Services Block Grant plan which contains provisions
describing how the state will carry out the assurances of the Community
Services Block Grant Act;
(17)  act as the state agency responsible for the evaluation and improvement
of emergency food assistance services in the state;
(18)  monitor the impact of social policies on the emergency food network;
(19)  provide training and technical assistance to all grantees to assist them
in program development and implementation, compliance with state and federal
regulations, and reporting and management information systems;
(20)  make the distributions required by Section 9-4-1409; and
(21)  administer other programs to alleviate poverty assigned to the office.
